Alabama, session 2026rs, HB604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) To further the intent of the Legislature
to create transparency and ensure all agencies uphold the
purposes of this section, on or before July 1, 2026, a
standing Accountability Council shall be created. The goal of
the Accountability Council is to ensure that the state's
educational accountability system supports improved outcomes
and long-term success for all Alabama students, with a focus
on closing achievement gaps.
(b) The Chairs of the House of Representatives and
Senate Education Policy Committees shall convene the
organizational meeting of the Accountability Council.
Thereafter, the Accountability Council shall meet at least
Page 1

Thereafter, the Accountability Council shall meet at least
HB604 Engrossed
annually to accomplish all of the following:
(1) Critically review the current state report card
provided in Section 16-6C-2, Code of Alabama 1975, and
research other state report cards for best practices for
improving student achievement.
(2) Guide the relevant state agencies and experts to
design an annual return on investment study as provided in
Section 2.
(3) Critically review the annual return on investment
study data to determine if college and career readiness
indicators are preparing students to be successful after
graduation.
(4) Monitor state report card implementation and engage
in formal reviews at established intervals.
(5) Provide recommendations for revisions to the
accountability system to the Governor, the Legislature, the
State Board of Education, and the State Department of
Education designed to increase student performance and achieve
lifelong success.
(c) The council shall be under the leadership of a
chair annually elected by the membership of the Accountability
Council.
(d) The membership of the Accountability Council shall
consist of all of the following:
(1) Five members appointed by the Governor: One member
who is a national expert on school accountability, two members
who are from the business community, and two at-large members.
(2) The Chair of the Senate Finance and Taxation
Page 2

(2) The Chair of the Senate Finance and Taxation
HB604 Engrossed
Education Committee.
(3) The Chair of the House Ways and Means Education
Committee.
(4) The Chair of the Senate Education Policy Committee.
(5) The Chair of the House Education Policy Committee.
(6) One member each appointed by the following:
a. The Secretary of Workforce.
b. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
c. The Minority Leader of the Senate.
d. The Speaker of the House of Representatives.
e. The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.
f. The State Superintendent of Education.
g. The Alabama Education Association.
h. The School Superintendents of Alabama.
i. The Alabama Association of School Boards.
j. The Council for Leaders in Alabama Schools.
k. The A+ Education Partnership.
l. The Alabama Commission on Higher Education.
m. The Alabama Public Charter Schools Association.
n. The Business Education Alliance.
o. The Alabama STEM Council.
(e) To inform the review of the Accountability Council
and to ensure that the college and career readiness indicators
accurately signal that students are prepared for high-wage,
high-growth opportunities in this state, the Alabama Workforce
Board, with support from the State Department of Education and
the Alabama Commission on Higher Education, shall develop a
system for collecting, analyzing, and reporting the public
Page 3

system for collecting, analyzing, and reporting the public
HB604 Engrossed
school student outcomes associated with the completion of each
college and career readiness indicator. All agencies shall
provide updated, relevant data as necessary to complete the
study on an annual basis. This shall include an annual
legislative report that captures the education system's return
on investment, ensuring the state captures and reports on
results beyond what is in the accountability formula
including, but not limited to:
(1) Postsecondary enrollment and persistence;
(2) Military enlistment;
(3) Industry-recognized credentials;
(4) Income within six years after graduation; and
(5) Employment in high-wage, high-demand career sectors
and occupations.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 4

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB604 Engrossed
100
101
102 House of Representatives
103 Read for the first time and referred ................10-Mar-26
104 to the House of Representatives
105 committee on Education Policy
106
107 Read for the second time and placed ................12-Mar-26
108 on the calendar:
109 1 amendment
110
111 Read for the third time and passed ................02-Apr-26
112 as amended
113 Yeas 93
114 Nays 1
115 Abstains 6
116
117
118 John Treadwell
119 Clerk
120
Page 5